Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1806
Award of fees and expenses against state; how paid.

Fees and expenses awarded by a federal court or pursuant to sections 25-1802 to 25-1805 shall be paid in the manner provided in the State Miscellaneous Claims Act. Claims for such fees and expenses shall be filed with the State Claims Board in the manner provided in such act.

Laws 1982, LB 192, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 6.

State Miscellaneous Claims Act, see section 81-8,294.